Massachusetts, session 194th, S233.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 146 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 official edition, is hereby 
amended by striking out section 65 and inserting in place thereof the following section:- 
Section 65. (a) Whoever desires to act as an operator of hoisting machinery shall apply to 
the division of occupational licensure for a license. If the criteria for licensure established by the 
commissioner of the division of occupational licensure pursuant to section fifty-three are met by 
the applicant, such applicant shall be required to pass a written or practical examination, or both, 
in accordance with the standards set in regulations promulgated under the provisions of said 
section fifty-three. Any operator of hoisting machinery whose license is revoked, and any person 
who is penalized under the provisions of section fifty-four A, shall be required to pass both a 
written and practical examination before he may be issued a subsequent license. The passing of 

of 2 11 the applicable examination shall entitle the applicant to a license to operate hoisting machinery in 
the category or categories for which he has applied and been examined. Each license issued shall 
contain a photograph of the licensee. 
(b) The division of occupational licensure shall make both written and practical 
examinations available in the languages of English and Spanish to operator of hoisting 
machinery applicants if the criteria for licensure established by the commissioner of the division 
of occupational licensure pursuant to section fifty-three are met by the applicant.